Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.100

Authority and duty of employer to engage in collective bargaining—Limitations—Mediation, grievance procedures upon failure to agree.

(1) A public employer shall have the authority to engage in collective bargaining with the exclusive bargaining representative and no public employer shall refuse to engage in collective bargaining with the exclusive bargaining representative. However, a public employer is not required to bargain collectively with any bargaining representative concerning any matter which by ordinance, resolution, or charter of said public employer has been delegated to any civil service commission or personnel board similar in scope, structure, and authority to the board created by chapter 41.06 RCW.

(2) Upon the failure of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining representative to conclude a collective bargaining agreement, any matter in dispute may be submitted by either party to the commission. This subsection does not apply to negotiations and mediations conducted between a school district employer and an exclusive bargaining representative under RCW 28A.657.050.

(3) If a public employer implements its last and best offer where there is no contract settlement, allegations that either party is violating the terms of the implemented offer shall be subject to grievance arbitration procedures if and as such procedures are set forth in the implemented offer, or, if not in the implemented offer, if and as such procedures are set forth in the parties' last contract.

[ 2010 c 235 s 801; 1989 c 45 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 21; 1967 ex.s. c 108 s 10.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.

Arbitration of labor disputes: Chapter 49.08 RCW.